Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Law Enforcement Officers’ Monument

§ 39-5-71.
Construction of monument.

The Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training, in cooperation with the Department of Archives and History and the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, is hereby authorized, subject to funds being made available, to cause to be constructed and maintained on state-owned lands at some suitable and appropriate place in or near the City of Jackson, a monument containing the names and paying tribute to all state, county and municipal law enforcement officers who have given their lives in the performance of their official duties. This shall include any federal law enforcement officer employed and residing in Mississippi at the time of death.

It is the intent of the Legislature that adequate space be left on the monument to be available to add names of law enforcement officers in the future who give their lives in the performance of their official duties.

The Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training is hereby authorized to accept gifts, grants and donations from individuals and organizations, to be deposited in the Law Enforcement Officers Monument Fund which is hereby created as a special fund in the State Treasury. The State Treasurer shall invest all monies in the fund and any interest earned shall be deposited into the fund. All funds deposited in the fund, including interest earned thereon, shall be used for the purpose of fund-raising, erecting and maintaining the monument as provided in subsection (1) of this section. The funds may be used for any fund-raising activity the board deems necessary for the construction and maintenance of the monument. Any monies remaining unexpended or unencumbered in the fund upon completion of the monument shall revert to the Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training for maintenance of the monument.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 366, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 352, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.